Tennessee, session 114, HB2237.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3507(c), is amended by adding
the following at the end of the subsection:
A copy of the report must also be submitted to the legislative librarian.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2237
012271
- 1 -